Washington statutes.
RCW 43.23.030

Powers and duties.

The director of agriculture shall exercise all the powers and perform all the duties relating to the development of markets, for agricultural products, state and federal cooperative marketing programs, land utilization for agricultural purposes, water resources, transportation, and farm labor as such matters relate to the production, distribution and sale of agricultural commodities including private sector cultured aquatic products as defined in RCW 15.85.020.

[ 1985 c 457 s 15; 1983 c 248 s 5; 1967 c 240 s 3; 1965 c 8 s 43.23.030. Prior: (i) 1921 c 7 s 90; RRS s 10848. (ii) 1937 c 90 s 10; RRS s 10847-1.]

NOTES:

Fair commission: Chapter 15.76 RCW.

Farm marketing: Chapters 15.64, 15.65, 15.66 RCW.